California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 24.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.14.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 34501.12, for purposes of this division, safety inspections of grape gondolas are governed by this section.

(b) Every registered owner of a grape gondola shall submit an application and the fee specified in subdivision (g) to the department for the initial inspection required by this section. The initial application shall be submitted on or before July 1, 1993. The inspection term for a grape gondola shall expire 25 months from the date the department
 conducts the inspection, and issues a certificate indicating the gondola has passed the inspection, and every 25 months thereafter. Applications and fees for subsequent inspections and certificates shall be submitted not later than seven months before the expiration of the then current inspection term. If the registered owner has submitted the inspection application and the required accompanying fees, but the department is unable to complete the inspection within the 25-month inspection period, then no additional fee shall be required for the inspection requested in the original application.

(c) On and after July 1, 1993, no person may operate any grape gondola without having submitted an inspection application and the required fees to the department as required by this section.

(d) On and after January 1, 1995, no person may operate any grape gondola, without the inspection
 described in subdivision (e) having been performed and a certificate having been issued to the owner.

(e) The safety inspection undertaken pursuant to this section shall be limited to an inspection of the brake system, steering, lights, connections, wheels and tires, frame, and suspension.

(f) For purposes of undertaking the inspection of grape gondolas under this section, the department shall schedule all inspections at one central location during a continuous eight-week period every odd-numbered year with at least two days of each week during that eight-week period devoted to the actual inspection. If the gondola does not pass its first inspection, it may be reinspected during the eight-week period at no additional cost.

(g) Fees shall be established by the department in an amount equal to the actual costs incurred
 by the department in carrying out this section, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for each inspection or reinspection.

(h) As used in this section, “grape gondola” means a motor vehicle which has been permanently altered and is attached to a grape tank by two means. The first mean is by use of a kingpin on the trunk which is centered through a turntable assembly on the tank. The second means of attachment is through the use of a pair of horizontal crossarms between the drive axle and the rear tank axle. The tank is designed to pivot off of the chassis on two support arms during dumping, and is further designed to be specifically compatible with dumping facilities of the wineries.

(i) This section only applies to a grape gondola that is used under all of the following conditions:

(1) For 60 days or less
 during any calendar year.

(2) For not more than 500 miles in any calendar year.

(3) Only for the transportation of grapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 724, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.15.

(a) The regulations adopted pursuant to Section 34501 shall require that any driver of a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 15210, be ordered out of service for 24 hours if the driver is found to have 0.01 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in his or her blood.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992, and shall remain operative until the director determines that federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Commercial Motor
 Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (49 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.) contained in that act and Section 391.15 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations do not require the state to order the operator of a commercial vehicle out of service for 24 hours when the operator has a measurable concentration of alcohol in his or her blood.

(c) The director shall submit a notice of the determination under subdivision (b) to the Secretary of State, and this section shall be repealed upon the receipt of that notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1114, Sec. 40.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.   Inoperative upon determination described in subd. (b).   Repealed upon notification prescribed in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

34501.16.

(a) Every employer of a commercial driver shall provide information to that employee at the time of hiring and to all employed commercial drivers annually, concerning all of the following:

(1) The prohibition against driving a commercial motor vehicle with over 0.04 percent or more, by weight, alcohol in his or her blood on and after January 1, 1992.

(2) The requirement to be placed out of service
 for 24 hours if the person’s blood-alcohol concentration is tested to be 0.01 percent or more, by weight, on and after January 1, 1992.

(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall include the information prescribed in subdivision (a), together with information concerning the alcohol concentration in a person’s blood resulting from consumption of alcoholic beverages, in each publication of the commercial driver’s handbook published after January 1, 1990.

(c) This section shall remain operative until the director determines that federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (49 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.) do not require the state to implement the prohibitions and requirements in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) The director shall submit a notice of the determination
 under subdivision (c) to the Secretary of State, and this section shall be repealed upon the receipt of that notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1114, Sec. 41.   Inoperative upon determination described in subd. (c).   Repealed upon notification prescribed in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

34501.17.

(a) All paratransit vehicles shall be regularly and systematically inspected, maintained, and lubricated by the owner or operator in accordance with the manufacturer’s recommendations, or more often if necessary to ensure the safe operating condition of the vehicle. The maintenance shall include, at a minimum, in-depth inspection of the vehicle’s brake system, steering components, lighting system, and wheels and tires, to be performed at intervals in accordance with the manufacturer’s recommendations.

(b) All owners or operators of paratransit vehicles shall document each systematic inspection, maintenance, and lubrication and repair performed for each vehicle subject to this section. Required records shall include service performed, the name of the person performing the service, the date that the service was performed, and the odometer reading of the vehicle at the time of the service. The records shall be maintained for the period that the vehicle is in service at the place of business in this state of the owner or operator of the vehicle, and shall be presented upon demand to any authorized representative of the department. The odometer of a paratransit vehicle shall be maintained in proper working order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 241, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.18.

(a) Every motor carrier regularly employing more than 20 full-time drivers shall report to the department whenever it replaces more than half of its drivers within a 30-day period. Within 21 days of receipt of that report, the department shall inspect the motor carrier to ensure that the motor carrier is complying with all safety of operations requirements, including, but not limited to, controlled substances testing and hours-of-service regulations. The reporting requirement of this subdivision does not apply to a motor carrier who, through
 normal seasonal fluctuations in the business operations of the carrier, or through termination of a contract for transportation services, other than a collective bargaining agreement, replaces drivers in one geographical location with drivers in another geographical location.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), “employing” means having an employer-employee relationship with a driver or contracting with an owner-operator, as described in Section 34624, to provide transportation services for more than 30 days within the previous year.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (a), “full-time” means that the driver is on-duty with the motor carrier for an average of 30 hours or more per week during the course of his or her employment or contract with the motor carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

34501.19.

A vehicle described in Section 34500 shall comply with the equipment requirements specified in Part 393 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, relating to automatic brake adjusters and brake adjustment indicators, antilock brake systems, frames, cab and body components, wheels, suspension systems, and steering wheel systems. In the application of this section to a vehicle, “commercial motor vehicle” and “motor vehicle” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 390.5 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 21.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34502.

In adopting rules and regulations, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall consider as evidence of generally accepted safety standards the rules and regulations which have been adopted by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2148.)
-------------------------------------------

34503.

It is the legislative intention in enacting this division that the rules and regulations adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to this division shall apply uniformly throughout the State of California, and no state agency, city, city and county, county, or other political subdivision of this State, including, but not limited to, a chartered city, city and county, or county, shall adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation which is inconsistent with the rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2148.)
-------------------------------------------

34504.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall enforce the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 34501. Rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 34501 shall become effective on March 1, 1965.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2148.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.

(a) Tour bus operators shall, in addition to the systematic inspection, maintenance, and lubrication services required of all motor carriers, require each tour bus to be inspected at least every 45 days, or more often if necessary to ensure safe operation. This inspection shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Brake adjustment.

(2) Brake system components and leaks.

(3) Steering and suspension systems.

(4) Tires and wheels.

(b) A tour bus shall not be used to transport passengers until all defects listed during the inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) have been corrected and attested to by the signature of the operator’s authorized representative.

(c) Records of inspections conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be kept at the operator’s maintenance facility or terminal where the tour bus is regularly garaged. The records shall be retained by the operator for one year, and shall be made available for inspection upon request by any authorized employee of the department. Each record shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of the vehicle, including make, model, license number, or other means of
 positive identification.

(2) Date and nature of each inspection and any repair performed.

(3) Signature of operator’s authorized representative attesting to the inspection and to the completion of all required repairs.

(4) Company vehicle number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1306, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.1.

(a) Upon determining that a tour bus carrier or modified limousine carrier has either
 failed to comply with the requirements specified in paragraph (1) or (2), or has been issued an out-of-service order for either an imminent hazard or an unsatisfactory or unfit rating by the United States Secretary of Transportation,
 the department shall recommend to the Public Utilities Commission that the carrier’s operating authority be suspended, denied, or revoked, or to the United States Department of Transportation that appropriate administrative action be taken against the carrier’s interstate operating authority, whichever is appropriate:

(1) The tour bus carrier or modified limousine carrier has failed to maintain any vehicle of the carrier in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor carrier safety, and, in the department’s opinion, the failure presents an imminent danger to public safety or constitutes such a consistent failure as to justify a recommendation to the Public Utilities Commission or the United States Department of Transportation.

(2) The tour bus carrier or modified limousine carrier has failed to
 enroll all drivers in the pull-notice system as required by Section 1808.1.

(b) For purposes of this section, two consecutive unsatisfactory compliance ratings for an inspected terminal assigned because the tour bus carrier or modified limousine carrier failed to comply with the periodic report requirements of Section 1808.1 or the cancellation of the carrier’s enrollment by the Department of Motor Vehicles for nonpayment of required fees may be determined by the department to be a consistent failure. However, when recommending denial of an application for new or renewal authority, the department need not
 conclude that the carrier’s failure presents an imminent danger to public safety or that it constitutes a consistent failure. The department need only conclude that the carrier’s compliance with the safety-related matters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is sufficiently unsatisfactory to justify a recommendation for denial. The department shall retain a record, by carrier, of every recommendation made pursuant to this section.

(c) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall notify the carrier in writing of all of the following:

(1) That the department
 has determined that the carrier’s safety record is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination.

(2) That the determination may result in a suspension, revocation, or denial of the carrier’s operating authority by the Public Utilities Commission or the United States Department of Transportation, as appropriate.

(3) That the carrier may request a review of the determination by the department within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. If a review is requested by the carrier, the department shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting
 a notification pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (c), upon determining during a terminal inspection or at any other time that the condition of a tour bus
 shows multiple safety violations of a nature that operation of the tour bus could constitute an imminent danger to public safety, the department shall immediately order the tour bus out of service. The tour bus shall not be subsequently operated with passengers until all of the safety violations have been corrected and the department has verified the correction of the safety violations upon a subsequent inspection by the department of the tour bus, which shall occur within five business days of the submission of a reinspection request from the tour bus carrier to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 10.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.2.

(a) In furtherance of the requirements specified in subdivision (c) of Section 34501, upon the request of, and in consultation with, representatives of a local government in a jurisdiction where tour buses operate, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall develop protocols for entering into memoranda of understanding with local governments to allow the department to increase the number of the locally operating tour buses that are being inspected by the department.

(b) A memorandum of understanding entered into with a local government pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include a provision that the local government will reimburse the department for all actual costs associated
 with conducting additional inspections.

(c) Any inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall
 not be duplicative of an inspection conducted by the department to meet the requirements specified in subdivision (c) of Section 34501.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   (AB 1677)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.5.

(a) Motor carriers operating any vehicle described in subdivision (a), (b), (e), (f), (g), or (k) of Section 34500, except those vehicles exempted under Section 34501.12, shall, as a part of the systematic inspection, maintenance, and lubrication services required of all motor carriers, require the vehicle or vehicles for which it is responsible pursuant to Section 34501.12 to be inspected at least every 90 days, or more often if necessary to ensure safe operation. Vehicles that are out of service for periods greater than 90 calendar days are not required to be inspected at 90-day intervals if they are inspected before operation on the highway. This inspection shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Brake adjustment.

(2) Brake system components and leaks.

(3) Steering and suspension systems.

(4) Tires and wheels.

(5) Vehicle connecting devices.

(b) No vehicle subject to this section shall be operated on the highway other than to a place of repair until all defects listed during the inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) have been corrected and attested to by the signature of the motor carrier’s authorized representative.

(c) Records of inspections conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be kept at the motor carrier’s terminals, as designated in accordance with Section 34501.12. The records shall be retained by the motor carrier
 for two years, and shall be made available for inspection upon request by any authorized employee of the department. Each record shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of the vehicle, including make, model, license number, company vehicle number, or other means of positive identification.

(2) Date and nature of each inspection and any repair performed.

(3) Signature of the motor carrier’s authorized representative attesting to the inspection and to the completion of all required repairs.

(d) Printouts of inspection and maintenance records maintained in computer systems shall be accepted in lieu of signed inspection or repair records if the printouts include the information required in paragraphs (1) and (2) of
 subdivision (c).

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, records of 90-day inspections need not be retained in California for interstate vehicles that are not physically based in California. However, when these vehicles are present in California, they are subject to inspection by the department. If the inspection results indicate maintenance program deficiencies, the department may require the motor carrier to produce the maintenance records or copies of those records for inspection within 10 working days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 16.   (AB 3278)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.6.

(a) Upon determining that a motor carrier of property, as defined in Section 34601, either is subject to paragraph (1) or (2), or has been issued an out-of-service order for either an imminent hazard or an unsatisfactory or unfit rating by the United States Secretary of Transportation, the department shall recommend that the Department of Motor Vehicles suspend or revoke the carrier’s motor carrier permit, or, for interstate operators, the department shall recommend to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration that appropriate administrative action be taken against the carrier.

(1) The motor carrier of property has failed to maintain any vehicle of a type described above in a
 safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor carrier safety, and, in the department’s opinion, that failure presents an imminent danger to public safety or constitutes a consistent failure so as to justify a recommendation to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) The motor carrier of property has failed to enroll all drivers in the pull-notice system as required by Section 1808.1.

(b) Upon determining that a household mover, or a household mover transporting used office, store, or institution furniture and fixtures under its household mover permit issued under Section 19241 of the Business and Professions Code, either is subject to paragraph (1) or (2), or has been
 issued an out-of-service order for either an imminent hazard or an unsatisfactory or unfit rating by the United States Secretary of Transportation, the department shall recommend that the Department of Consumer Affairs deny, suspend, or revoke the carrier’s household mover permit, or, for interstate operators, the department shall recommend to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration that appropriate administrative action be taken against the household mover.

(1) The motor carrier of property has failed to maintain any vehicle of the carrier in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations relative to motor carrier safety, and, in the department’s opinion, that failure presents an imminent danger to public safety or constitutes a
 consistent failure so as to justify a recommendation to the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(2) The motor carrier of property has failed to enroll all drivers in the pull-notice system as required by Section 1808.1.

(c) For purposes of this section, two consecutive unsatisfactory compliance ratings for an inspected terminal assigned because the motor carrier failed to comply with the periodic report requirements of Section 1808.1 or the cancellation of the carrier’s enrollment by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the nonpayment of required fees is a consistent failure. The department shall retain a record, by operator, of every recommendation made pursuant to this section.

(d) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to
 subdivision (a), the department shall notify the carrier in writing of all of the following:

(1) That the department has determined that the carrier’s safety record or compliance with Section 1808.1 is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination.

(2) That the determination may result in a suspension, revocation, or denial of the carrier’s motor carrier permit by the Department of Motor Vehicles, suspension, revocation, or denial of the carrier’s household mover permit suspended, revoked, or denied, by the Department of Consumer Affairs, or administrative action by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

(3) That the carrier may
 request a review of the determination by the department within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. If a review pursuant to this paragraph is requested by the carrier, the department shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting any notification pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b).

(e) Upon receipt of a written recommendation from the department that a motor carrier permit or household mover permit be suspended, revoked, or denied, the Department of Motor Vehicles or Department of Consumer Affairs, as appropriate, shall, pending a hearing in the matter pursuant to Section 34623 or appropriate Department of Consumer Affairs authority, suspend the motor carrier permit or household mover permit. The written recommendation shall specifically indicate compliance with subdivision
 (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 22.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.7.

(a) Upon determining that a private carrier of passengers, as defined in Section 34681 of the Vehicle Code, has either failed to comply with the
 requirements specified in paragraph (1) or (2), or has been issued an out-of-service order for either an imminent hazard or an unsatisfactory rating by the United States Secretary of Transportation, the department shall make a written recommendation to the Department of Motor Vehicles that the carrier’s registration be suspended:

(1) The private carrier of passengers has failed to maintain any vehicle of the carrier in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations
 relative to motor carrier safety, and, in the department’s opinion, the failure presents an imminent danger to public safety or constitutes such a consistent failure as to justify a recommendation to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) The private carrier of passengers has failed to enroll all drivers in the pull-notice system as required by Section 1808.1.

(b) For purposes of this section, two consecutive unsatisfactory terminal ratings assigned for failure to comply with the periodic report requirements in Section 1808.1, or cancellation of an employer’s enrollment by the Department of Motor Vehicles for nonpayment of fees, constitutes a consistent failure. The department shall retain a record, by operator, of every recommendation made pursuant
 to this section.

(c) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall give written notice to the carrier of all of the following:

(1) That the department has determined that the carrier’s safety record is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination.

(2) That the determination may result in a suspension or revocation of the carrier’s registration by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) That the carrier may request a review of the determination by the department within five days of its receipt of the notice required by this subdivision. If a review pursuant to this paragraph is requested by the carrier, the department shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting
 a notification pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Commercial vehicle inspection facilities along the border of Mexico, including those in Calexico and Otay Mesa, shall be staffed at all times by a Department of the California Highway Patrol inspector whenever those facilities are open to the public. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall also assign, as staffing permits, a commercial inspector to control truck traffic entering the United States at the Tecate border crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 311, Sec. 11.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.8.

(a) A charter-party carrier of passengers engaged in charter bus transportation shall ensure that the driver of a vehicle as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5363 of the Public Utilities Code that is designed to carry 39 or more passengers shall instruct or play a video for all passengers on the safety equipment and emergency exits on the vehicle prior to the beginning of any trip and provide each passenger with written or video instructions that include, at a minimum, a demonstration of the location and operation of all exits, including emergency exits, the requirement to wear a seatbelt, if available, and that not wearing a seatbelt is punishable by a fine.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, no later than July 1, 2018,
 the department shall adopt standards and criteria for the implementation of the safety requirements specified in this section.

(c) This section does not alter or affect the requirements of the Passenger Charter-party Carriers’ Act (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5351) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code).

(d) The amendments to this section as added by the act that added this subdivision shall be operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 593, Sec. 4.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Amended version operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (d).)
-------------------------------------------

34505.9.

(a) An ocean marine terminal that receives and dispatches intermodal chassis may conduct the intermodal roadability inspection program, as described in this section, in lieu of the inspection required by Section 34505.5, if the terminal meets all of the following conditions:

(1) More than 1,000 chassis are based at the ocean marine terminal.

(2) The ocean marine terminal, following the two most recent consecutive
 inspections required by Section 34501.12, has received satisfactory compliance ratings, and the terminal has received no unsatisfactory compliance ratings as a result of any inspection conducted in the interim between the consecutive inspections conducted under Section 34501.12.

(3) Each intermodal chassis exiting the ocean marine terminal shall have a current decal and supporting documentation in accordance with Section 396.17 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) The ocean marine terminal’s intermodal roadability inspection program shall consist of all of the following:

(A) Each time an intermodal chassis is released from the ocean marine terminal, the chassis shall be inspected. The inspection shall include, but not be limited to, brake adjustment, brake system components and leaks, suspension
 systems, tires and wheels, vehicle connecting devices, and lights and electrical system, and shall include a visual inspection of the chassis to determine that it has not been tampered with.

(B) Each inspection shall be recorded on a daily roadability inspection report that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Positive identification of the intermodal chassis, including company identification number and vehicle license plate number.

(ii) Date and nature of each inspection.

(iii) Signature, under penalty of perjury, of the ocean marine terminal operator or an authorized representative that the inspection has been performed.

(iv) The inspector shall affix a green
 tag to a chassis that has passed inspection and a red tag to a chassis that has failed inspection. The tag shall contain the name of the inspector and the date and time that the inspection was completed and shall be placed in a conspicuous location so that it may be viewed from the rear of the vehicle. The tag shall be provided by the marine terminal operator and shall meet specifications determined by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The provisions of this subparagraph shall also be applicable to an intermodal chassis inspected by a marine terminal operator pursuant to Section 34505.5.

(C) Records of each inspection conducted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be retained for 90 days at the ocean marine terminal at which each chassis is based and shall be made available upon request by any authorized employee of the department.

(D) Defects noted on any intermodal
 chassis shall be repaired, and the repairs shall be recorded on the intermodal chassis maintenance file, before the intermodal chassis is released from the control of the ocean marine terminal. No vehicle subject to this section shall be released to a motor carrier or operated on the highway other than to a place of repair until all defects listed during the inspection conducted pursuant to subparagraph (A) have been corrected and attested to by the signature of the operator’s authorized representative.

(E) Records of maintenance or repairs performed pursuant to the inspection in subparagraph (A) shall be maintained at the ocean marine terminal for two years and shall be made available upon request of the department. Repair records may be retained in a computer system if printouts of those records are provided to the department upon request.

(F) Individuals performing ocean marine
 terminal roadability inspections pursuant to this section shall be qualified, at a minimum, as set forth in Section 396.19 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Evidence of each inspector’s qualification shall be retained by the ocean marine terminal operator for the period during which the inspector is performing intermodal roadability inspections.

(b) The records maintained pursuant to paragraphs (C) and (E) of subdivision (a) and Section 34505.5 shall be made available during normal business hours to any motor carrier or driver or the authorized representative thereof who has been engaged to transport an intermodal container on a chassis inspected pursuant to this section or Section 34505.5 from the ocean marine terminal.

(c) Any citation issued for the violation of any state or federal law related to the defective condition of an intermodal chassis subject to
 inspection pursuant to this section or Section 34505.5, that is not owned by that motor carrier or commercial driver, shall be issued to the entity responsible for the inspection and maintenance of the intermodal chassis, unless the officer determines that the defective condition of the intermodal chassis was caused by the failure of the driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle in a safe manner.

(d) Any provision contained in a contract between the registered owner or lessee of an intermodal chassis subject to inspection pursuant to this section, or any other entity responsible for the inspection and maintenance of the intermodal chassis, and any motor carrier or any contract between a motor carrier and another motor carrier engaged to transport an intermodal container on a chassis subject to inspection pursuant to this section that contains a hold harmless or indemnity clause concerning defects in the physical condition of that chassis
 shall be void as against public policy. This subdivision shall not apply to damage to the intermodal chassis caused by the negligent or willful failure of the motor carrier to operate a commercial motor vehicle in a safe manner.

(e) Following a terminal inspection in which the department determines that an operator of an ocean marine terminal has failed to comply with the requirements of this section, the department shall conduct a reinspection within 120 days as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 34501.12. If the terminal fails the reinspection, the department shall direct the operator to comply with the requirements of Section 34505.5 until eligibility to utilize the inspection program described in this section is reestablished pursuant to subdivision (a). If any inspection results in an unsatisfactory rating due to conditions presenting an imminent danger to the public safety or due to the operator’s repeated failure to inspect and
 repair intermodal chassis pursuant to this section, the department shall immediately forward a recommendation to the Department of Motor Vehicles to suspend the operator’s motor carrier property permit, and forward a recommendation to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration for administrative or other action deemed necessary against the carrier’s interstate operating authority, pursuant to Section 34505.6 or 34505.7.

(f) Any driver who believes that an intermodal chassis is in an unsafe operating condition may request that the chassis be reinspected by the entity responsible for the inspection and maintenance of the chassis pursuant to this section or Section 34505.5. The request for reinspection, any corrective action taken, or the reason why corrective action was not taken shall be recorded in the intermodal chassis maintenance file.

(g) No commercial driver shall be
 threatened, coerced, or otherwise retaliated against by any ocean marine terminal operator for contacting a law enforcement agency with regard to the physical condition of an intermodal chassis or for requesting that the intermodal chassis be reinspected or repaired.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Intermodal chassis” means a trailer designed to carry intermodal freight containers.

(2) “Ocean marine terminal” means a terminal, as defined in Section 34515, located at a port facility that engages in the loading and unloading of the cargo of oceangoing vessels.

(i) Nothing in this section shall relieve a commercial driver or commercial motor carrier of any duty imposed by state or federal law related to the
 safe operation of a commercial motor vehicle.

(j) Nothing in this section shall affect the rights, duties, and obligations set forth in Section 2802 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

34505.10.

Motor carriers who contract or subcontract transportation service for other motor carriers shall retain all required records relating to the dispatch of vehicles and drivers and the pay of drivers that are not required to be retained by the carrier for whom the contracted or subcontracted service is performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 652, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

34506.

It is a misdemeanor to fail to comply with any rule or regulation adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Section 34501, 34501.5, 34508, or 34513 regarding any of the following:

(a) Hours of service of drivers. 

(b) Hazardous material transportation. 

(c) Schoolbus construction, design, color, equipment, maintenance, or operation. 

(d) Youth
 bus equipment, maintenance, or operation. 

(e) Tour bus equipment, maintenance, or operation. 

(f) Equipment, maintenance, or operation of any vehicle described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g) of Section 34500. 

(g) Equipment, maintenance, or operation of any school pupil activity bus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 928, Sec. 36.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

34506.3.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, it is an infraction to fail to comply with any rule or regulation adopted by the department pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 298, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

34506.4.
